Louisiana, session 2026, SB370.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2153(F)(7) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2153. Powers of the board
* * *
F. In addition to any other duties and powers granted by this Chapter, the
board shall:
* * *
(7) Have plenary authority to review all standard construction practices
performed within the state and shall have the authority to hold hearings for the
purpose of suspending or revoking any license for substandard construction
practices in violation of this Chapter.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-577 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 370